Illinois, session 104th, HB3844.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pesticide Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4, 12, and 14 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 60/4)  (from Ch. 5, par. 804)7    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    1. "Director" means Director of the Illinois Department of 9Agriculture or his authorized representative.10    2. "Active Ingredient" means any ingredient which will 11prevent, destroy, repel, control or mitigate a pest or which 12will act as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.13    3. "Adulterated" shall apply to any pesticide if the 14strength or purity is not within the standard of quality 15expressed on the labeling under which it is sold, distributed 16or used, including any substance which has been substituted 17wholly or in part for the pesticide as specified on the 18labeling under which it is sold, distributed or used, or if any 19valuable constituent of the pesticide has been wholly or in 20part abstracted.21    4. "Agricultural Commodity" means produce of the land, 22including, but not limited to, plants and plant parts, 23livestock and poultry and livestock or poultry products,   HB3844 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1seeds, sod, shrubs and other products of agricultural origin 2including the premises necessary to and used directly in 3agricultural production. Agricultural commodity also includes 4aquatic products, including any aquatic plants and animals or 5their by-products that are produced, grown, managed, harvested 6and marketed on an annual, semi-annual, biennial or short-term 7basis, in permitted aquaculture facilities.8    5. "Animal" means all vertebrate and invertebrate species 9including, but not limited to, man and other mammals, birds, 10fish, and shellfish.11    5.5. "Barrier mosquitocide" means a pesticide that is 12formulated to kill adult mosquitoes and that is applied so as 13to leave a residual mosquitocidal coating on natural or 14manmade surfaces. "Barrier mosquitocide" does not include a 15product that is exempt from registration under the Federal 16Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, or rules adopted 17pursuant to that Act.18    5.6. "Barrier mosquitocide treatment" means application of 19a barrier mosquitocide to a natural or manmade surface. 20    6. "Beneficial Insects" means those insects which during 21their life cycle are effective pollinators of plants, 22predators of pests or are otherwise beneficial.23    7. "Certified applicator".24        A. "Certified applicator" means any individual who is 25    certified under this Act to purchase, use, or supervise 26    the use of pesticides which are classified for restricted   HB3844 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1    use.2        B. "Private applicator" means a certified applicator 3    who purchases, uses, or supervises the use of any 4    pesticide classified for restricted use, for the purpose 5    of producing any agricultural commodity on property owned, 6    rented, or otherwise controlled by him or his employer, or 7    applied to other property if done without compensation 8    other than trading of personal services between no more 9    than 2 producers of agricultural commodities.10        C. "Licensed Commercial Applicator" means a certified 11    applicator, whether or not he is a private applicator with 12    respect to some uses, who owns or manages a business that 13    is engaged in applying pesticides, whether classified for 14    general or restricted use, for hire. The term also applies 15    to a certified applicator who uses or supervises the use 16    of pesticides, whether classified for general or 17    restricted use, for any purpose or on property of others 18    excluding those specified by subparagraphs 7 (B), (D), (E) 19    of Section 4 of this Act.20        D. "Commercial Not For Hire Applicator" means a 21    certified applicator who uses or supervises the use of 22    pesticides classified for general or restricted use for 23    any purpose on property of an employer when such activity 24    is a requirement of the terms of employment and such 25    application of pesticides under this certification is 26    limited to property under the control of the employer only   HB3844 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1    and includes, but is not limited to, the use or 2    supervision of the use of pesticides in a greenhouse 3    setting. "Commercial Not For Hire Applicator" also 4    includes a certified applicator who uses or supervises the 5    use of pesticides classified for general or restricted use 6    as an employee of a state agency, municipality, or other 7    duly constituted governmental agency or unit.8    8. "Defoliant" means any substance or combination of 9substances which cause leaves or foliage to drop from a plant 10with or without causing abscission.11    9. "Desiccant" means any substance or combination of 12substances intended for artificially accelerating the drying 13of plant tissue.14    10. "Device" means any instrument or contrivance, other 15than a firearm or equipment for application of pesticides when 16sold separately from pesticides, which is intended for 17trapping, repelling, destroying, or mitigating any pest, other 18than bacteria, virus, or other microorganisms on or living in 19man or other living animals.20    11. "Distribute" means offer or hold for sale, sell, 21barter, ship, deliver for shipment, receive and then deliver, 22or offer to deliver pesticides, within the State.23    12. "Environment" includes water, air, land, and all 24plants and animals including man, living therein and the 25interrelationships which exist among these.26    13. "Equipment" means any type of instruments and   HB3844 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1contrivances using motorized, mechanical or pressure power 2which is used to apply any pesticide, excluding pressurized 3hand-size household apparatus containing dilute ready to apply 4pesticide or used to apply household pesticides.5    14. "FIFRA" means the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and 6Rodenticide Act, as amended.7    15. "Fungi" means any non-chlorophyll bearing 8thallophytes, any non-chlorophyll bearing plant of a lower 9order than mosses or liverworts, as for example rust, smut, 10mildew, mold, yeast and bacteria, except those on or in living 11animals including man and those on or in processed foods, 12beverages or pharmaceuticals.13    16. "Household Substance" means any pesticide customarily 14produced and distributed for use by individuals in or about 15the household.16    17. "Imminent Hazard" means a situation which exists when 17continued use of a pesticide would likely result in 18unreasonable adverse effects on the environment or will 19involve unreasonable hazard to the survival of a species 20declared endangered by the U.S. Secretary of the Interior or 21to species declared to be protected by the Illinois Department 22of Natural Resources.23    18. "Inert Ingredient" means an ingredient which is not an 24active ingredient.25    19. "Ingredient Statement" means a statement of the name 26and percentage of each active ingredient together with the   HB3844 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1total percentage of inert ingredients in a pesticide and for 2pesticides containing arsenic in any form, the ingredient 3statement shall include percentage of total and water soluble 4arsenic, each calculated as elemental arsenic. In the case of 5spray adjuvants the ingredient statement need contain only the 6names of the functioning agents and the total percent of those 7constituents ineffective as spray adjuvants.8    20. "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate 9animals generally having the body more or less obviously 10segmented for the most part belonging to the class Insects, 11comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms, as for example 12beetles, caterpillars, and flies. This definition encompasses 13other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless 14and usually have more than 6 legs as for example spiders, 15mites, ticks, centipedes, and millipedes.16    21. "Label" means the written, printed or graphic matter 17on or attached to the pesticide or device or any of its 18containers or wrappings.19    22. "Labeling" means the label and all other written, 20printed or graphic matter: (a) on the pesticide or device or 21any of its containers or wrappings, (b) accompanying the 22pesticide or device or referring to it in any other media used 23to disseminate information to the public, (c) to which 24reference is made to the pesticide or device except when 25references are made to current official publications of the U. 26S. Environmental Protection Agency, Departments of   HB3844 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1Agriculture, Health, Education and Welfare or other Federal 2Government institutions, the state experiment station or 3colleges of agriculture or other similar state institution 4authorized to conduct research in the field of pesticides.5    23. "Land" means all land and water area including 6airspace, and all plants, animals, structures, buildings, 7contrivances, and machinery appurtenant thereto or situated 8thereon, fixed or mobile, including any used for 9transportation.10    24. "Licensed large-scale operator Operator" means a 11person who is employed to apply pesticides to the lands of 12others under the direction of a "licensed commercial 13applicator" or a "licensed commercial not-for-hire applicator" 14and who applies pesticides with large-scale application 15equipment, such as boom sprayers or tractor-mounted spray 16equipment, or other large-scale application equipment as 17further prescribed by the Department of Agriculture by rule.18    24.5. "Licensed small-scale operator" means a person who 19is employed to apply pesticides to the lands of others under 20the direction of a licensed commercial applicator or a 21licensed commercial not-for-hire applicator and who applies 22pesticides with equipment other than the large-scale 23application equipment used by licensed large-scale operators. 24    25. "Nematode" means invertebrate animals of the phylum 25nemathelminthes and class nematoda, also referred to as nemas 26or eelworms, which are unsegmented roundworms with elongated   HB3844 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1fusiform or sac-like bodies covered with cuticle and 2inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts.3    26. "Permit" means a written statement issued by the 4Director or his authorized agent, authorizing certain acts of 5pesticide purchase or of pesticide use or application on an 6interim basis prior to normal certification, registration, or 7licensing.8    27. "Person" means any individual, partnership, 9association, fiduciary, corporation, or any organized group of 10persons whether incorporated or not.11    28. "Pest" means (a) any insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, 12weed, or (b) any other form of terrestrial or aquatic plant or 13animal life or virus, bacteria, or other microorganism, 14excluding virus, bacteria, or other microorganism on or in 15living animals including man, which the Director declares to 16be a pest.17    29. "Pesticide" means any substance or mixture of 18substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or 19mitigating any pest or any substance or mixture of substances 20intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.21    30. "Pesticide Dealer" means any person who distributes 22registered pesticides to the user.23    31. "Plant Regulator" means any substance or mixture of 24substances intended through physiological action to affect the 25rate of growth or maturation or otherwise alter the behavior 26of ornamental or crop plants or the produce thereof. This does   HB3844 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1not include substances which are not intended as plant 2nutrient trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant or seed 3inoculants or soil conditioners or amendments.4    32. "Protect Health and Environment" means to guard 5against any unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.6    33. "Registrant" means a person who has registered any 7pesticide pursuant to the provision of FIFRA and this Act.8    34. "Restricted Use Pesticide" means any pesticide with 9one or more of its uses classified as restricted by order of 10the Administrator of USEPA.11    35. "SLN Registration" means registration of a pesticide 12for use under conditions of special local need as defined by 13FIFRA.14    36. "State Restricted Pesticide Use" means any pesticide 15use which the Director determines, subsequent to public 16hearing, that an additional restriction for that use is needed 17to prevent unreasonable adverse effects.18    37. "Structural Pest" means any pests which attack and 19destroy buildings and other structures or which attack 20clothing, stored food, commodities stored at food 21manufacturing and processing facilities or manufactured and 22processed goods.23    38. "Unreasonable Adverse Effects on the Environment" 24means the unreasonable risk to the environment, including man, 25from the use of any pesticide, when taking into account 26accrued benefits of as well as the economic, social, and   HB3844 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1environmental costs of its use.2    39. "USEPA" means United States Environmental Protection 3Agency.4    40. "Use inconsistent with the label" means to use a 5pesticide in a manner not consistent with the label 6instruction, the definition adopted in FIFRA as interpreted by 7USEPA shall apply in Illinois.8    41. "Weed" means any plant growing in a place where it is 9not wanted.10    42. "Wildlife" means all living things, not human, 11domestic, or pests.12    43. "Bulk pesticide" means any registered pesticide which 13is transported or held in an individual container in undivided 14quantities of greater than 55 U.S. gallons liquid measure or 15100 pounds net dry weight.16    44. "Bulk repackaging" means the transfer of a registered 17pesticide from one bulk container (containing undivided 18quantities of greater than 100 U.S. gallons liquid measure or 19100 pounds net dry weight) to another bulk container 20(containing undivided quantities of greater than 100 U.S. 21gallons liquid measure or 100 pounds net dry weight) in an 22unaltered state in preparation for sale or distribution to 23another person.24    45. "Business" means any individual, partnership, 25corporation or association engaged in a business operation for 26the purpose of selling or distributing pesticides or providing   HB3844 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1the service of application of pesticides in this State.2    46. "Facility" means any building or structure and all 3real property contiguous thereto, including all equipment 4fixed thereon used for the operation of the business.5    47. "Chemigation" means the application of a pesticide 6through the systems or equipment employed for the primary 7purpose of irrigation of land and crops.8    48. "Use" means any activity covered by the pesticide 9label, including, but not limited to, application of 10pesticide, mixing and loading, storage of pesticides or 11pesticide containers, disposal of pesticides and pesticide 12containers and reentry into treated sites or areas.13(Source: P.A. 102-555, eff. 1-1-22; 102-916, eff. 1-1-23; 14103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 15    (415 ILCS 60/12)  (from Ch. 5, par. 812)16    Sec. 12. Licensed operator. No pesticide operator shall 17use any pesticides without a pesticide operator license issued 18by the Director.19    1. Application for an operator license shall be made in 20writing on designated forms available from the Director. Each 21application shall contain information regarding the nature of 22applicants pesticide use, his qualifications, and such other 23facts as prescribed on the form. The application shall also 24include the following:25        A. The full name of applicant.  HB3844 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1        B. The address of the applicant.2        C. The name of and license/certification number of the 3    pesticide applicator under whom the applicant will work.4    2. The Director shall not issue a pesticide operator 5license until the individual identified has demonstrated his 6competence and knowledge regarding pesticide use in accordance 7with Section 9 of this Act. The Director shall issue separate 8certification tests for both licensed large-scale operators 9and licensed small-scale operators based on the rules and 10regulations prescribed for each by the Department of 11Agriculture. 12    3. The Director shall not issue an operator license to any 13person who is unable to provide the name and 14license/certification number of an applicator under whom the 15operator will work.16    4. For the years preceding the year 2001, a licensed 17commercial operator working for or under the supervision of a 18certified licensed commercial pesticide applicator shall pay 19an annual fee of $25. For the years 2001, 2002, and 2003, the 20annual fee for a commercial operator license is $30. For the 21years 2004, 2005, and 2006, the annual fee for a commercial 22operator license is $35. For the years 2007 through 2017, the 23annual fee for a commercial operator license is $40. For the 24years 2018 through 2023, the fee for a multi-year commercial 25operator license is $120. For the years 2024 and thereafter, 26the fee for a multi-year commercial operator license is $180.   HB3844 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1The late application fee for an operator license shall be $20 2in addition to the normal license fee. A licensed operator 3shall be assessed a fee of $10 for a duplicate license.4    5. For the years 2011 through 2017, the commercial 5not-for-hire pesticide operator license fee shall be $15. For 6the years 2018 through 2023, the fee for a multi-year 7commercial not-for-hire pesticide operator license is $45. For 8the years 2024 and thereafter, the fee for a multi-year 9commercial not-for-hire pesticide operator license is $90. The 10late application fee for a commercial not-for-hire operator 11license shall be $20 in addition to the normal license fee. A 12commercial not-for-hire operator shall be assessed a fee of 13$10 for a duplicate license.14(Source: P.A. 103-441, eff. 1-1-24.) 15    (415 ILCS 60/14)  (from Ch. 5, par. 814)16    Sec. 14. Unlawful acts. 17    1. The following are violations of this Act, if any 18person:19        A. Made false or fraudulent claims through any media 20    misrepresenting the effect of pesticides or methods.21        B. Applied known ineffective or improper pesticides.22        C. Applied pesticides in a faulty, careless, or 23    negligent manner.24        D. Used or made recommendation for use of a pesticide 25    inconsistent with the labeling of the pesticide.  HB3844 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1        E. Neglected, or after notice in writing, refused, to 2    comply with provisions of this Act, the regulations 3    adopted hereunder, or of any lawful order of the Director, 4    including the limitations specified in a duly issued 5    permit, certification, or registration.6        F. Failed to keep and maintain records required by 7    this Act or failed to make reports when and as required or 8    made false or fraudulent records or reports.9        G. Used or supervised the use of a pesticide without 10    qualifying as a certified applicator, licensed small-scale 11    operator, or licensed large-scale operator.12        H. Used fraud or misrepresentation in making 13    application for, or renewal of, any license, permit, 14    certification, or registration or in demonstration of 15    competence.16        I. Aided or abetted a person to evade provisions of 17    this Act, conspired with any person to evade provisions of 18    this Act or allowed a license, permit, certification or 19    registration to be used by another person.20        J. Impersonated any federal, state, county, or city 21    official.22        K. Purchased pesticides by using another person's 23    license or using or purchasing pesticides outside of a 24    specific category for which that person is licensed or any 25    other misrepresentation.26        L. Fails to comply with the rules and regulations   HB3844 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1    adopted under the authority of this Act.2    2. Except as provided in Section 14 (2G), it is unlawful 3for any person to distribute in the State the following:4        A. A pesticide not registered pursuant to provisions 5    of this Act.6        B. Any pesticide, if any claim made for it, use 7    recommendation, other labeling or formulation, differs 8    from the representations made in connection with 9    registration. However, a change in labeling or formulation 10    may be made within a registration if the change does not 11    violate provisions of FIFRA or this Act.12        C. Any pesticide unless in the registrants unbroken 13    container.14        D. Any pesticide container to which all label 15    information required under provisions of this Act has not 16    been securely affixed.17        E. Any pesticide which is adulterated or misbranded or 18    any device which is misbranded.19        F. Any pesticide in a container which, due to damage, 20    is hazardous to handle and store.21        G. It shall not be unlawful to distribute pesticides 22    "in bulk" provided such distribution does not violate the 23    provisions of this Act, the Rules and Regulations under 24    this Act, or FIFRA.25    3. It shall be unlawful:26        A. To sell any pesticide labeled for restricted use to   HB3844 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1    any applicator not certified, unless such applicator has a 2    valid permit authorizing purchase under a special 3    exemption from certification requirements.4        B. To handle, store, display, use or distribute 5    pesticides in such manner as to endanger man and his 6    environment, to endanger food, feed or other products that 7    may be stored, displayed or distributed with such 8    pesticides.9        C. To use, dispose of, discard, or store pesticides or 10    their containers in such a manner as to endanger public 11    health and the environment or to pollute water supplies.12        D. To use for personal advantage, reveal to persons, 13    other than the Director designee or properly designated 14    official of other jurisdictions, or to a physician or 15    other qualified person in cases of emergency for 16    preparation of an antidote any information judged as 17    relating to trade secrets. To use or reveal a financial 18    information obtained by authority or marked as privileged 19    or confidential by a registrant.20        E. To sell any pesticide labeled for restricted use 21    over an Internet website to an Illinois resident who is 22    not a certified pesticide applicator as provided under 23    Section 11 of this Act. 24        F. To apply a restricted use pesticide on or within 25    500 feet of school property during normal hours, except 26    for whole structure fumigation. However, if the pesticide   HB3844 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1    application information listed on the pesticide label is 2    more restrictive than this paragraph (F), then the more 3    restrictive provision shall apply. The Department of 4    Agriculture shall adopt rules necessary to implement the 5    provisions of this paragraph (F). As used in this 6    paragraph (F), "normal school hours" means Monday through 7    Friday from 7 a.m. until 4 p.m., excluding days when 8    classes are not in session. 9    4. Exemptions from the violation provisions of this Act 10are as follows:11        A. Carriers lawfully engaged in transporting 12    pesticides within this State, provided that such carrier 13    shall upon request permit the Director to copy all records 14    showing transactions in the movement of the pesticide or 15    device.16        B. Public officials of this State or the federal 17    government while engaged in the performance of official 18    duties in administration of pesticide laws or regulations.19        C. Persons who ship a substance or mixture of 20    substances being tested for the purpose of determining its 21    value for pesticide use, to determine its toxicity or 22    other properties and from which such user does not derive 23    any benefit in pest control from its use.24    5. No pesticide or device shall be deemed in violation of 25this Act when intended solely for export to a foreign country. 26If it is not exported all the provisions of this Act shall   HB3844 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 10167 BDA 20239 b1apply.2(Source: P.A. 102-548, eff. 1-1-22.)